tr: Aida kumaş sıklığı: 10 count; 11 count; 12 count; 13 count; 14 count; 15 count; 16 count; 18 count; 20 count; 22 count; 24 count; 28 count; 6 count; 8 count; Diğer
sk-SK: Hustota látky Aida: 10 ct; 11 ct; 12 ct; 13 ct; 14 ct; 15 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 24 ct; 28 ct; 6 ct; 8 ct; Iné
bg-BG: Брой нишки на Aida плат: 10 каунта; 11 каунта; 12 каунта; 13 каунта; 14 каунта; 15 каунта; 16 каунта; 18 каунта; 20 каунта; 22 каунта; 24 каунта; 28 каунта; 6 каунта; 8 каунта; Други
ko: 아이다 원단 카운트: 10카운트; 11카운트; 12카운트; 13카운트; 14카운트; 15카운트; 16카운트; 18카운트; 20카운트; 22카운트; 24카운트; 28카운트; 6카운트; 8카운트; 기타
nb: Aida-stofftelling: 10-count; 11-count; 12-count; 13-count; 14-count; 15-count; 16-count; 18-count; 20-count; 22-count; 24-count; 28-count; 6-count; 8-count; Annet
hu: Aida szövet szálszáma: 10 count; 11 count; 12 count; 13 count; 14 count; 15 count; 16 count; 18 count; 20 count; 22 count; 24 count; 28 count; 6 count; 8 count; Egyéb
fr: Nombre de points de la toile Aïda: 10 points; 11 points; 12 points; 13 points; 14 points; 15 points; 16 points; 18 points; 20 points; 22 points; 24 points; 28 points; 6 points; 8 points; Autre
zh-CN: 阿依达布支数: 10 CT; 11 CT; 12 CT; 13 CT; 14 CT; 15 CT; 16 CT; 18 CT; 20 CT; 22 CT; 24 CT; 28 CT; 6 CT; 8 CT; 其他
es: Número de puntos de la tela Aida: De 10 hilos; De 11 hilos; De 12 hilos; De 13 hilos; De 14 hilos; De 15 hilos; De 16 hilos; De 18 hilos; De 20 hilos; De 22 hilos; De 24 hilos; De 28 hilos; De 6 hilos; De 8 hilos; Otro
sl-SI: Gostota blaga Aida: 10-count; 11-count; 12-count; 13-count; 14-count; 15-count; 16-count; 18-count; 20-count; 22-count; 24-count; 28-count; 6-count; 8-count; Drugo
cs: Hustota vyšívací látky Aida: 10ct; 11ct; 12ct; 13ct; 14ct; 15ct; 16ct; 18ct; 20ct; 22ct; 24ct; 28ct; 6ct; 8ct; Ostatní
da: Aida-stofantal: 10-count; 11-count; 12-count; 13-count; 14-count; 15-count; 16-count; 18-count; 20-count; 22-count; 24-count; 28-count; 6-count; 8-count; Andet
pt-PT: Contagem do tecido Aida: 10-count; 11-count; 12-count; 13-count; 14-count; 15-count; 16-count; 18-count; 20-count; 22-count; 24-count; 28-count; 6-count; 8-count; Outro
zh-TW: 愛達布織數: 10 CT; 11 CT; 12 CT; 13 CT; 14 CT; 15 CT; 16 CT; 18 CT; 20 CT; 22 CT; 24 CT; 28 CT; 6 CT; 8 CT; 其他
ru: Плотность ткани Аида: 10 каунт; 11 каунт; 12 каунт; 13 каунт; 14 каунт; 15 каунт; 16 каунт; 18 каунт; 20 каунт; 22 каунт; 24 каунт; 28 каунт; 6 каунт; 8 каунт; Другое
fi: Aida-kankaan tiheys: 10-count; 11-count; 12-count; 13-count; 14-count; 15-count; 16-count; 18-count; 20-count; 22-count; 24-count; 28-count; 6-count; 8-count; Muu
el: Αριθμός υφασμάτων Aida: 10-count; 11-count; 12-count; 13-count; 14-count; 15-count; 16-count; 18-count; 20-count; 22-count; 24-count; 28-count; 6-count; 8-count; Άλλο
nl: Dichtheid van Aida-stof: 10-count; 11-count; 12-count; 13-count; 14-count; 15-count; 16-count; 18-count; 20-count; 22-count; 24-count; 28-count; 6-count; 8-count; Overig
vi: Mật độ vải Aida: 10 count; 11 count; 12 count; 13 count; 14 count; 15 count; 16 count; 18 count; 20 count; 22 count; 24 count; 28 count; 6 count; 8 count; Khác
sv: Aida-tygantal: 10-count; 11-count; 12-count; 13-count; 14-count; 15-count; 16-count; 18-count; 20-count; 22-count; 24-count; 28-count; 6-count; 8-count; Övrigt
ro-RO: Număr pânză Aida: 10-count; 11-count; 12-count; 13-count; 14-count; 15-count; 16-count; 18-count; 20-count; 22-count; 24-count; 28-count; 6-count; 8-count; Altele
ja: アイーダ布の目数: 10カウント; 11カウント; 12カウント; 13カウント; 14カウント; 15カウント; 16カウント; 18カウント; 20カウント; 22カウント; 24カウント; 28カウント; 6カウント; 8カウント; その他
lt-LT: Aida audinio tankis: 10 dydžio; 11 dydžio; 12 dydžio; 13 dydžio; 14 dydžio; 15 dydžio; 16 dydžio; 18 dydžio; 20 dydžio; 22 dydžio; 24 dydžio; 28 dydžio; 6 dydžio; 8 dydžio; Kita
pl: Liczba krzyżyków kanwy: 10 ct; 11 ct; 12 ct; 13 ct; 14 ct; 15 ct; 16 ct; 18 ct; 20 ct; 22 ct; 24 ct; 28 ct; 6 ct; 8 ct; Inne
it: Conteggio del tessuto Aida: 10 count; 11 count; 12 count; 13 count; 14 count; 15 count; 16 count; 18 count; 20 count; 22 count; 24 count; 28 count; 6 count; 8 count; Altro
hr-HR: Broj platna aida: 10-count; 11-count; 12-count; 13-count; 14-count; 15-count; 16-count; 18-count; 20-count; 22-count; 24-count; 28-count; 6-count; 8-count; Ostalo
th: จำนวนช่องตะเข็บของผ้า Aida: 10-count; 11-count; 12-count; 13-count; 14-count; 15-count; 16-count; 18-count; 20-count; 22-count; 24-count; 28-count; 6-count; 8-count; อื่นๆ
de: Fadenzahl des Aida-Tuchs: 10-Count; 11-Count; 12-Count; 13-Count; 14-Count; 15-Count; 16-Count; 18-Count; 20-Count; 22-Count; 24-Count; 28-Count; 6-Count; 8-Count; Andere
en: Aida cloth count: 10-count; 11-count; 12-count; 13-count; 14-count; 15-count; 16-count; 18-count; 20-count; 22-count; 24-count; 28-count; 6-count; 8-count; Other
pt-BR: Contagem de tecido Aida: Trama 10; Trama 11; Trama 12; Trama 13; Trama 14; Trama 15; Trama 16; Trama 18; Trama 20; Trama 22; Trama 24; Trama 28; Trama 6; Trama 8; Outros